src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON BORGE_IV !Contracted Impersonal Verbs
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV:%> ContrImpersonal ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
! +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;  !replaced
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBORGE ;
! +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
! Here I have exchanged Pekkaºs original BORGE with DOHPPE. DeverbalVerbsBORGE
! was not defined, and since they are deverbal verbs, intransitive impersonal
! BORGE should behave like intransitive personal DOHPPE. TT 020108.
!LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBORGE now up and going. TO 020106




!   2b. already derived words
!   -------------------------


LEXICON CIRRO_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Inchoatives and essives on -á, -o, -e without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> CIRROStem ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;

LEXICON MUITA_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Inchoatives and essives on -á, -o, -e with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> CIRROStemTV ;
 +V+TV:»j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»supmái K ; !just for evenstems
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;

LEXICON BASSO_IV ! Bisyllabic, inherently passive -ot verbs
 +V+IV: OT-PASSIVE-BASSO ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N:»m PRE_BOAHTALADDAN ;



! 2c. lexicas tweaked (mostly) for speller reasons
!   ----------------------------------------------

LEXICON COHKKA_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Contracted Verbs without Personal Passive - no stit-deverbal
 +V+IV:%> CIRROStem ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsCOHKKA ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;

LEXICON GARRE_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  garret, loget. with Personal Passive. for speller to hinder garrenávnnas, garrenoaivi etc
 +V+TV:%> GARREStem ;
 +V+TV:»j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»supmái K ; !just for evenstems
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;

LEXICON ORRO_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  orrot. for speller to hinder orronsadji etc
 +V+IV:%> ORROStem ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;



!   2d. other special lexicas
!   -------------------------

LEXICON MAHTA_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Contracted Verbs without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.
 +V+TV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;
! This lexicon goes as GILLE except for the TV tag.
! The reason is that máhttát takes acc objects, but does not have passive.




! Substems for contracted verbs
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON BASSO-MUITAL
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsC ;

LEXICON DOHPPEStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJTV ;
 DeverbalNounsDOHPPE- ;

LEXICON GARREStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJTV ;
 DeverbalNounsGARRE- ;


LEXICON CIRROStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
 DeverbalNounsCIRRO- ;

LEXICON ORROStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
 DeverbalNounsORRO- ;


LEXICON CIRROStemTV
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJTV ;
 DeverbalNounsCIRROTV- ;


LEXICON DOHPPEINCH
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! Der/goah0ti changed to Der/InchL, as 0 is bad in tag
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Use/NG:»šgoahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! ditto
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj ; !
 DOHPPECnj ;

LEXICON DOHPPECnj
 :j jStemsDOHPPE ; !Ind Imprt nominalformsC2
 :Y5 VStemsDOHPPE ; !Ind+Prt, Cond, Pot, Imprt
 :Y6 VjStemsDOHPPE ; !Prt
!removed "+Der/j" in front of ":»j"



LEXICON VStemsDOHPPE
 +Ind+Prs: VSufDOHPPE ;
 +Cond: CondV2 ;
 +Pot+Prs:ž PotC ;
 +Imprt: ImprtSg2 ; !Prs
 NominalFormsVC ;

LEXICON CondV2
 +Prs:š CondBOAHTI ;
 +Prs+Use/NG:l CondBOAHTI ;
 +Prs+Err/Orth:šivčče%> CondC ; !gorošivčči
 +Prs+Err/Orth:šivčče%> CondC ; ! goarošivčči
 +Prs+Err/Orth:šivčče%> CondC ; !áiggušivčči


LEXICON VjStemsDOHPPE
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV1 ;

LEXICON jStemsDOHPPEpass
 +Ind: CSufDOHPPE ;

LEXICON jStemsDOHPPE
 +Ind: CSufDOHPPE ;
 ImprtC2 ;
  NominalFormsC2 ;

LEXICON VSufDOHPPE
 PrsV1 ;
 PrsV2 ;
 PrsV4 ;
 PrsV5 ;

LEXICON CSufDOHPPE
 +Prs: PrsC1 ;
 +Prt: PrtC3 ;

LEXICON OT-PASSIVE-BASSO
! The first two entries from DOHPPE
! CIRROStem ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
 +Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-PLX:»mušš MUSH ;
! +Der1+Der/meahttun+A+Err/Orth:»X7#meahttu MEAHTTUN ;
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
! DOHPPEINCH ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! Der/goah0ti changed to Der/InchL, as 0 is bad in tag
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Use/NG:»šgoahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! ditto
 :%>j jStemsDOHPPE ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>Y5 VSufDOHPPE ;
 +Cond:%>Y5 CondV2 ;
 +Pot+Prs:%>Y5ž PotC ;
 +Imprt:%>Y5 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5me K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»Y5min K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»Y5men K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»Y5n R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»Y5ma R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»Y5mis K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»Y5mij K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»Y5ma K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mat K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»Y5mak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/PlGen:»Y5mijd R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijdda K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»Y5mijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijgujn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»Y5mij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijddi%> PxVvowch ; !!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijddi%> PxVvowch ;	!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijddás%> PxC ;		!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijnni%> PxVvowch ;	!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;	!not likely

 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV2 ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Inf:%>Y5t K ;
 +Actio+Nom:%>Y5n K ;
 +Actio+Gen:%>Y5n K ; ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5me K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:%>Y5min K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:%>Y5men K ;
 +Actio+Loc:%>Y5mis K ;
 +Actio+Com:%>Y5mijn K ;
 :Y6 VjStemsDOHPPE ;
! The entry leading to PASSIVE in DOHPPE is omitted here.
! The next entries are the non-passive partS of the DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE entry.
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»st BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»stalla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»stadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/st+V:»stasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»steasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+TV:»h BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»halla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»hadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/st+V:»hasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»heasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:»d BASSO-MUITAL ;
