src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Humsubj-VGenVerbs
čohkkát:čohkká COHKKA_IV ;
čohkkát+Err/Orth:čohká COHKKA_IV ;
LEXICON Humsubj-VerbRoot   !!= * **@CODE@**
atnit+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassL+Err/Orth:atnojuvvo BASSO_IV ;
atnit+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassS+Err/Orth:atno BASSO_IV ;
ballát+V+IV+Err/Orth-a-á:balla%>j jStemsDOHPPE ;
belkot:belko BASSO_IV ;
gohččot:gohččo BASSO_IV ;
bidjat+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassS+Err/Orth:bidjo BASSO_IV ;
bidjat+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassL+Err/Orth:bidjojuvvo BASSO_IV ;
bivvát:bivvá CIRRO_IV ;
buhttejuvvot:buhttejuvvo BASSO_IV ;
gohččojuvvot:gohččojuvvo BASSO_IV ;
gohččojuvvot+Err/Orth:gohččujuvvo BASSO_IV ;
buohccát:buohccá CIRRO_IV ;
báhkket:báhkke GARRE_TV ;
suvrát:suvrá CIRRO_IV ;
dadjat+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassS:dadjo BASSO_IV ;
dadjat+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassL:dadjojuvvo BASSO_IV ;
dahkat+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassS+Err/Orth:dahko BASSO_IV ;
dahkat+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassL+Err/Orth:dahkojuvvo BASSO_IV ;
deddot:deddo BASSO_IV ;
dihttot:dihtto BASSO_IV ;
doddjot:doddjo BASSO_IV ;
dovdát:dovdá MUITA_TV ;
duohtandahkat+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassL+Err/Orth:duohtan#dahkojuvvo BASSO_IV ;
dutkat+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassL+Err/Orth:dutkkojuvvo BASSO_IV ;
eallát:eallá CIRRO_IV ;
virrot:virro BASSO_IV ;
fuobmát+V+TV+Err/Orth-a-á:fuobma%>j jStemsDOHPPE ;
galbmot+Err/Orth-a-á:gálbmo BASSO_IV ;
garret:garre GARRE_TV ;
skielgát:skielgá CIRRO_IV ;
gildot:gildo BASSO_IV ;
gohččut+Err/Orth:gohččo MUITA_TV ;
gullot:gullo BASSO_IV ;
gullát:gullá MUITA_TV ;
gustot:gusto CIRRO_IV ;
haksot:hakso BASSO_IV ;
heaŋgát:heaŋgá CIRRO_IV ;
rihkkut+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassS:rihkko BASSO_IV ;
jovgot:jovgo BASSO_IV ;
loget:loge GARRE_TV ;
lohkkot:lohkko BASSO_IV ;
ludnet+V+TV+Err/Orth:lutne%>j jStemsDOHPPE ;
láhppot+Err/Orth-a-á:lahppo BASSO_IV ;
moddját+Err/Orth:modjá CIRRO_IV ;
muitát:mujtá MUITA_TV ;
máhttát:máhttá MAHTA_TV ;
njakčát:njakčá CIRRO_IV ;
nohkkot:nohkko BASSO_IV ;
oađđát:oađđá CIRRO_IV ;
orrot:orro ORRO_IV ;
ráfot:ráfo  BASSO_IV ;
siđvát:siđvá CIRRO_IV ;
soahttát:soahttá CIRRO_IV ;
suhččot:suhččo BASSO_IV ;
veddot:veddo BASSO_IV ;
vuordát:vuordá MUITA_TV ;
vuostálastit+Err/Orth:vuostálaste MUITA_TV ;
vuvdot:vuvdo BASSO_IV ;
vávvát:vávvá CIRRO_IV ;
áššáskuhttot:áššáskuhtto BASSO_IV ;
čatnat+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassL+Err/Orth:čatnojuvvo BASSO_IV ;
čirrot:čirro CIRRO_IV ;
čuollát:čuollá CIRRO_IV ;
sisačálihuvvot:sisa#čálihuvvo BASSO_IV ;
addjot:addjo BASSO_IV ;
báitot:báito BASSO_IV ;
dearšát:dearšá CIRRO_IV ;
gaifát:gajfá MUITA_TV ;
geđđot:geđđo BASSO_IV ;
naffát:naffá CIRRO_IV ;
reitot:rejto BASSO_IV ;
veanzát:veanzá CIRRO_IV ;
eretjohttát:eret#johttá CIRRO_IV ;
beaggát:beaggá CIRRO_IV ;
náitot:nájto BASSO_IV ;
goanzát:goanzá CIRRO_IV ;
stoalpát:stoalpá CIRRO_IV ;
skuhččát:skuhččá CIRRO_IV ;
LEXICON 3-VerbRoot
čoggot:čoggo BASSO_IV ;
ahccát:ahccá CIRRO_IV ;
ahttot:ahtto BASSO_IV ;
arvát:arvá BORGE_IV ;
balvet:balve BORGE_IV ;
bieđgát:bieđgá CIRRO_IV ;
biggot:biggo BASSO_IV ;
bivdot:bivdo BASSO_IV ;
boggát:boggá CIRRO_IV ;
borget:borge BORGE_IV ;
buicát:bujcá CIRRO_IV ;
buođgát:buođgá CIRRO_IV ;
cirkát:cirká CIRRO_IV ;
deaškát:deašká CIRRO_IV ;
dovdot:dovdo BASSO_IV ;
eretvuoddját:eret#vuoddjá CIRRO_IV ;
fadnot:fadno BASSO_IV ;
firtet:firte BORGE_IV ;
virtet:virte BORGE_IV ;
fállot:fállo BASSO_IV ;
garcát:garcá CIRRO_IV ;
geaigát:geajgá CIRRO_IV ;
genddot:genddo BASSO_IV ;
giekcát:giekcá CIRRO_IV ;
goarját:goarjá CIRRO_IV ;
gohccot:gohcco BASSO_IV ;
golgot:golgo BASSO_IV ;
golket:golke BORGE_IV ;
guoggát:guoggá CIRRO_IV ;
gurpát:gurpá CIRRO_IV ;
guđđot:guđđo BASSO_IV ;
gávkát:gávká CIRRO_IV ;
heaittihuvvot:heaittihuvvo BASSO_IV ;
huilát:hujlá CIRRO_IV ;
jalkát:jalká CIRRO_IV ;
jallet:jalle BORGE_IV ;
jađgŋot:jađgŋo BASSO_IV ;
jurbmát:jurbmá CIRRO_IV ;
jávvot:jávvo BASSO_IV ;
leanzát:leanzá CIRRO_IV ;
loaggát:loaggá CIRRO_IV ;
luistát:lujstá CIRRO_IV ;
moskát:moská CIRRO_IV ;
muktot:mukto BASSO_IV ;
muohttát:muohttá BORGE_IV ;
nagadestot:nagadesto BASSO_IV ;
njallet:njalle BORGE_IV ;
njalsát:njalsá CIRRO_IV ;
njeđgot:njeđgo BASSO_IV ;
njoalcát:njoalcá CIRRO_IV ;
njuolgát:njuolgá CIRRO_IV ;
njurdot:njurdo BASSO_IV ;
obbot:obbo  BASSO_IV ;
rančát:rančá CIRRO_IV ;
realsát:realsá CIRRO_IV ;
rekčot:rekčo  BASSO_IV ;
rihccát:rihccá CIRRO_IV ;
roakčát:roakčá CIRRO_IV ;
ropmát:ropºmá CIRRO_IV ;
ruoidnát:ruojdná CIRRO_IV ;
ránčát:ránčá CIRRO_IV ;
rátkot:rátko BASSO_IV ;
sivlot:sivlo BASSO_IV ;
skihččát:skihččá CIRRO_IV ;
skuibát:skujbá CIRRO_IV ;
smoggát:smoggá CIRRO_IV ;
snolkát:snolká CIRRO_IV ;
spálčát:spálčá CIRRO_IV ;
stirrát:stirrá CIRRO_IV ;
stávrát:stávrá CIRRO_IV ;
suđđot:suđđo BASSO_IV ;
sáhttot:sáhtto BASSO_IV ; !here because disamb gang wants sáhttit intrans.
toardnát:toardná CIRRO_IV ;
vaŋkát:vaŋká CIRRO_IV ;
virtet:virte BORGE_IV ;
váfot:váfo BASSO_IV ;
váhččet:váhčče BORGE_IV ;
vázzot:vázzo BASSO_IV ;
áidnet:ájdne BORGE_IV ;
áššehuvvot:áššehuvvo BASSO_IV ;
šealgát:šealgá CIRRO_IV ;
šerret:šerre BORGE_IV ;
čidnot:čidno BASSO_IV ;
šlahttet:šlahtte BORGE_IV ;
šlahttát:šlahttá BORGE_IV ;
šleancát:šleancá CIRRO_IV ;
šluŋkát:šluŋká CIRRO_IV ;
šnjuoggát:šnjuoggá CIRRO_IV ;
čovdot:čovdo BASSO_IV ;
čuiket:čujke BORGE_IV ;
čuorgát:čuorgá CIRRO_IV ;
sorját:sorjá CIRRO_IV ;
